California statutes. Public Utilities Code
(e) The commission and gas corporation shall provide opportunities for meaningful, substantial, and ongoing participation by the gas corporation workforce in the development and implementation of the plan, with the objective of developing an industrywide culture of safety that will minimize accidents, explosions, fires, and dangerous conditions for the protection of the public and the gas corporation workforce. 

(f) Nothing in this section limits the obligation of a gas corporation to provide adequate service and facilities for the convenience of the public and its employees pursuant to Section 451 or the authority of the commission to enforce that obligation under state law.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 522, Sec. 1.   (SB 705)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

963.

(a) For purposes of this section, the following terms have the following meanings:

(1) “After-meter services” includes, but is not limited to, leak investigation, inspecting customer piping and appliances, carbon monoxide investigation, pilot relighting, and high bill investigation.

(2) “Basic gas service” includes transmission, storage for reliability of service, and distribution of natural gas, purchasing natural gas on behalf of a customer, revenue cycle services, and after-meter services.

(3) “Metering services” includes, but is not limited to, gas meter installation, meter
 maintenance, meter testing, collecting and processing consumption data, and all related services associated with the meter.

(4) “Revenue cycle services” means metering services, billing the customer, collection, and related customer services.

(b) The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(1) In order to ensure that all core customers of a gas corporation continue to receive safe basic gas service, each existing gas corporation shall continue to provide this essential service.

(2) A customer shall not be required to pay separate fees for utilizing services that protect public or customer safety.

(3) It is the policy of the state that the commission and each gas corporation
 place safety of the public and gas corporation employees as the top priority. The commission shall take all reasonable and appropriate actions necessary to carry out the safety priority policy of this paragraph consistent with the principle of just and reasonable cost-based rates.

(c) (1) The commission shall require each gas corporation to provide bundled basic gas service to all core customers in its service territory unless the customer chooses or contracts to have natural gas purchased and supplied by another entity.

(2) A gas corporation shall continue to be the exclusive provider of revenue cycle services to all customers in its service territory, except that an entity purchasing and supplying natural gas under the commission’s existing core aggregation program may perform billing and collection services for its customers under the same terms as
 currently authorized by the commission, and except that a supplier of natural gas to noncore customers may perform billing and collection for natural gas supply for its customers.

(3) The gas corporation shall continue to calculate its charges for services provided by that corporation. If the commission establishes credits to be provided by the gas corporation to core aggregation or noncore customers who obtain billing or collection services from entities other than the gas corporation, the credit shall be equal to the billing and collection services costs actually avoided by the gas corporation.

(4) The commission shall require the distribution rate to continue to include after-meter services and shall authorize sufficient revenues and employee staffing to provide for prompt provision of these services to the public, consistent with the policy developed and implemented by the gas
 corporation and approved by the commission pursuant to Section 961.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 522, Sec. 2.   (SB 705)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

969.

In any ratemaking proceeding in which the commission authorizes a gas corporation to recover expenses for the gas corporation’s transmission pipeline integrity management program established pursuant to Subpart O (commencing with Section 192.901) of Part 192 of Title 49 of the United States Code or related capital expenditures for the maintenance and repair of transmission pipelines, the commission shall require the gas corporation to establish and maintain a balancing account for the recovery of those expenses. Any unspent moneys in the balancing account in the form of an accumulated account balance at the end of each rate case cycle, plus interest, shall be returned to ratepayers through a true-up filing. Nothing in this section is intended to interfere with the commission’s discretion to
 establish a two-way balancing account.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 523, Sec. 1.   (SB 879)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

970.

(a) The commission shall perform an analysis of benchmark data and adopt safety performance metrics for pipeline safety.

(b) The commission shall consider the
 following principles when adopting safety performance metrics:

(1) Each safety performance metric shall be designed to be an indicator of safety performance.

(2) Each safety performance metric shall be designed so that it may be reevaluated within a useful timeframe.

(3) Each safety performance metric shall be designed so that the data inputs to the metric are verifiable.

(4) The adopted set of safety performance metrics shall be robust enough to serve as a useful indicator of pipeline safety.

(c) The commission shall evaluate a gas corporation’s safety performance
 using the safety performance
 metrics
 adopted pursuant to subdivision (a) and may implement a rate incentive program. The rate incentive program may contain penalties based on safety performance.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 469, Sec. 2.   (AB 1456)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

972.

(a) A penalty assessed against a gas corporation pursuant to this part in regards to a natural gas storage facility leak shall at least equal the amount necessary to reduce the impact on the climate from greenhouse gases by an amount equivalent to the impact on the climate from the greenhouse gases emitted by the leak from the natural gas storage facility, as determined by the State Air Resources Board. In determining the amount necessary to fully offset the impact on the climate from the gases emitted by the leak, the commission shall consider the extent to which the gas corporation has mitigated, or is in the process of mitigating, the impact on the climate from greenhouse gas emissions resulting from the leak.

(b) This section shall not affect or be interpreted to
 affect the authority of the State Air Resources Board to adopt rules and regulations to reduce greenhouse gas emissions at natural gas storage facilities or to require mitigation of natural gas leaks from those facilities.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 814, Sec. 1.   (SB 801)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Methane Leakage Abatement [975. - 978.]

975.

(a) For purposes of this chapter, “commission-regulated gas pipeline facility” has the same meaning as defined in Section 950.

(b) With priority given to safety, reliability, and affordability of service, the commission shall adopt rules and procedures governing the operation, maintenance, repair, and replacement of those commission-regulated gas pipeline facilities that are intrastate transmission and distribution lines, as described in paragraphs (1) and (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 950, to achieve both of the following:

(1) Minimize leaks as a hazard to be mitigated pursuant to paragraph (1)
 of subdivision (d) of Section 961, consistent with the requirements of Section 192.703(c) of Subpart M of Title 49 of the Code of Federal Regulations, the commission’s General Order 112-E, and their successors.

(2) While giving due consideration to the cost considerations of Section 977, reduce emissions of natural gas from those commission-regulated gas pipeline facilities that are intrastate transmission and distribution lines to the maximum extent feasible in order to advance the state’s goals in reducing emissions of greenhouse gases pursuant to the California Global Warming Solutions
 Act of 2006 (Division 25.5 (commencing with Section 38500) of the Health and Safety Code).

(c) As soon as practicable, the commission shall require gas corporations to file a report that includes, but is not limited to, all of the following:

(1) A summary of utility leak management practices.

(2) A list of new methane leaks in 2013 by grade.

(3) A list of open leaks that are being monitored or are scheduled to be repaired.

(4) A best estimate of gas loss due to leaks.

(d) Not later than January 15, 2015, the commission, in consultation with the State Air Resources Board,
 shall commence a proceeding to adopt rules and procedures for those commission-regulated pipeline facilities that are intrastate transmission and distribution lines, as respectively described in paragraphs (1) and (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 950, to achieve the goals of subdivision (b).

(e) The rules and procedures adopted pursuant to subdivision (d) shall accomplish all of the following:

(1) Provide for the maximum technologically feasible and cost-effective avoidance, reduction, and repair of leaks and leaking components in those commission-regulated gas pipeline facilities that are intrastate transmission and distribution lines within a reasonable time after discovery, consistent with the California Global Warming Solutions Act of 2006 (Division 25.5 (commencing with Section 38500) of the Health and Safety Code) to achieve the goals in subdivision (b).

(2) Provide for the repair of leaks as soon as reasonably possible after discovery, consistent with established safety requirements and the goals of reducing air pollution and the climate change impacts of methane emissions.

(3) Evaluate the operations, maintenance, and repair practices of those commission-regulated gas pipeline facilities that are intrastate transmission and distribution lines to determine whether existing practices are effective at reducing methane leaks and promoting public safety, consistent with Section 961, achieve
 the goals of subdivision (b), and whether alternative practices may be more effective at achieving the goals of subdivision (b).

(4) Establish and require the use of best practices for leak surveys, patrols, leak survey technology, leak prevention, and leak reduction. The commission shall consider in the development of best practices the quality of materials and equipment. Collected
 leak data shall remain the property of the utility and shall be available to the commission and parties in commission proceedings as determined by the commission or specified by statute.

(5) Establish protocols and procedures for the development and use of metrics to quantify the volume of emissions from leaking gas pipeline facilities, and for evaluating and tracking leaks geographically and over time, that may be incorporated into the plans required by Section 961, or into other state emissions tracking systems, or both, including the regulations for the reporting of greenhouse gases of the State Air Resources Board. The quantification of emissions shall provide operators, the commission, and the public
 with accurate information about the number and severity of leaks and about the quantity of natural gas that is emitted into the atmosphere over time.

(6) To the extent feasible, require the owner of each commission-regulated gas pipeline facility that is an intrastate
 transmission or distribution line to calculate and report to the commission and the State Air Resources Board a baseline systemwide leak rate, along with any data and computer models used in making that calculation, to periodically update that systemwide leak rate calculation, and to annually report on measures that will be taken in the following year to reduce the systemwide leak rate to achieve the goals of subdivision (b).

(f) The rules and procedures, including best practices and repair standards, shall be incorporated into the safety plans required by Section 961 and the
 applicable general orders adopted by the commission.

(g) Consistent with subdivision (e) of Section 961, the commission shall facilitate robust ongoing participation of the workforce of gas corporations and those state and federal entities that have regulatory roles of relevance in all aspects of the proceeding to ensure that the rules and procedures it adopts are not inconsistent with the regulations and procedures adopted by those agencies.
 Nothing in this section affects the commission’s authority to determine eligibility for intervenor compensation.

(h) Nothing in this article shall affect or shall be interpreted to affect the existing authority of the State Air Resources Board to adopt rules and regulations to achieve the maximum technologically feasible and cost-effective greenhouse gas emission reductions and to maintain and continue emission reductions under the California Global Warming Solutions Act of 2006 (Division 25.5 (commencing with Section 38500) of the Health and Safety Code).

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 525, Sec. 2.   (SB 1371)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

977.

In order to achieve transparency and accountability for rate revenues and best value for ratepayers, and consistent with the commission’s existing ratemaking procedures and authority to establish just and reasonable rates, the commission shall consider all of the following:

(a) Providing an adequate workforce to achieve the objectives of reducing hazards and emissions from leaks, including leak avoidance, reduction, and repair.

(b) Providing revenues for all activities identified and required pursuant to Section 975, including any adjustment of allowance for lost and unaccounted for gas related to actual leakage volumes.

(c) Providing guidance for treatment of expenditures as being either an item of expense or a capital investment.

(d) The impact on affordability of gas service for vulnerable customers as a result of the incremental costs of compliance with the adopted rules and procedures.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 525, Sec. 2.   (SB 1371)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

978.

Except as expressly so provided, this article does not expand or in any manner alter the commission’s jurisdiction over the regulation of emissions of greenhouse gases.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 525, Sec. 2.   (SB 1371)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4.7. Core Transport Agent [980. - 989.5.]

980.

As used in this chapter, the following terms mean the following:

(a) “Core gas customer” has the same meaning as that specified in the tariff of the gas corporation whose territory the customer in question lies within. A core small commercial customer account that is associated with and part of the same business operation as a noncore large commercial customer account is not a “core gas customer” for purposes of this chapter.

(b) “Core transport agent” means an entity that offers core gas procurement service to customers within the service territory of a gas corporation, but does not include a gas corporation, and does not include a public agency that offers gas
 service to core and noncore gas customers within its jurisdiction, or within the service territory of a local publicly owned gas utility. “Core transport agent” includes the unregulated affiliates and subsidiaries of a gas corporation.

(c) “Gas corporation” has the same meaning as that set forth in Section 222.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 604, Sec. 4.   (SB 656)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

981.

(a) A core transport agent shall register with the commission within 90 days after the commission has adopted standards for financial viability, and technical and operational capacity. As a precondition to registration, the core transport agent shall provide, under oath, declaration, or affidavit, all of the following to the commission:

(1) Legal name and any other names under which the core transport agent is doing business in California.

(2) Current telephone number.

(3) Current address.

(4) Agent for service of process.

(5) State and date of incorporation, if any.

(6) Number for a customer contact representative, or other personnel for receiving customer inquiries.

(7) Brief description of the nature of the service being provided.

(8) Disclosure of any civil, criminal, or regulatory
 sanctions or penalties imposed within the 10 years immediately prior to registration, against the company or any owner, partner, officer, or director of the company pursuant to any state or federal consumer protection law or regulation, and of any felony convictions of any kind against the company or any owner, partner, officer, or director of the company. In addition, a core transport agent shall furnish the commission with fingerprints for those owners, partners, officers, and managers of the core transport agent specified by any commission decision applicable to all core transport agents. The commission shall submit completed fingerprint cards to the Department of Justice. Those fingerprints shall be available for use by the Department of Justice and the Department of Justice may transmit the fingerprints to the Federal Bureau of Investigation for a national criminal history record check. The commission may use information obtained from a national criminal history record check conducted pursuant to this
 section to determine a core transport agent’s eligibility for registration.

(9) Proof of financial viability. The commission shall develop uniform standards for determining financial viability and shall publish those standards for public comment no later than June 30, 2014. In determining the financial viability of the core transport agent, the commission shall take into account the number of customers the potential registrant expects to serve, the number of therms of gas it expects to provide, and any other appropriate criteria to ensure that core gas customers have adequate recourse in the event of fraud or nonperformance.

(10) Proof of technical and operational ability. The commission shall develop uniform standards for determining technical and
 operational capacity and shall publish those standards for public comment no later than June 30, 2014.

(11) A statement stating the following:
“Neither the applicant, any of its affiliates, officers, directors, partners, agents, or owners (directly or indirectly) with more than 10 percent interest in the applicant, or anyone acting in a management capacity for applicant has: (A) held one of those positions with a company that filed for bankruptcy, (B) been personally found liable, or held one of those positions with a company that has been found liable, for fraud, dishonesty, failure to disclose, or misrepresentations to consumers or others, (C) been convicted of a felony, (D) been (to his or her knowledge) the subject of a criminal referral by a judge or public agency, (E) had a license of operating
 authority denied, suspended, revoked, or limited in any jurisdiction, (F) personally entered into a settlement, or held one of those positions with a company that has entered into settlement, of criminal or civil claims involving violations of Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 17000) of Part 2 of, or Part 3 (commencing with Section 17500) of Division 7 of, the Business and Professions Code or of any other statute, regulation, or decisional law relating to fraud, dishonesty, failure to disclosure, or misrepresentations to consumers or others, (G) been found to have violated any statute, law, or rule pertaining to public utilities or other regulated industries, or (H) entered into any settlements or agreements, made any voluntary payments, or agreed to any other type of monetary forfeitures in resolution of any action by any regulatory body, agency, or attorney general.”
(b) Before reentering the market,
 a core transport agent whose registration has been revoked shall file a formal application with the commission that satisfies the requirements set forth in Section 982 and demonstrates the fitness and ability of the core transport agent to comply with all applicable rules of the commission.

(c) Registration with the commission is an exercise of the licensing function of the commission, and does not constitute regulation of the rates or terms and conditions of service offered by core transport agents. This part does not authorize the commission to regulate the rates or terms and conditions of service offered by core transport agents.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 604, Sec. 4.   (SB 656)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

982.

(a) The registration shall be deemed approved and a registration number issued no later than 45 days after the required information has been submitted, unless the commission’s executive director finds, upon review of the information submitted by the core transport agent or available to the commission, that there is evidence to support a finding that the core transport agent has committed an act constituting grounds for denial of registration as specifically set forth in the operative provisions of this chapter, including, but not limited to, subdivision (c).

(b) Upon a finding by the commission’s executive director that there is evidence
 to support a finding that the core transport agent has committed an act constituting grounds for denial of registration as set forth in this section, the commission shall notify the core transport agent in writing, cause the documents submitted by the core transport agent to be filed as a formal application for registration, and notice an expedited hearing on the registration of the core transport agent to be held within 30 days of the notification to the core transport agent of the executive director’s finding of evidence to support denial of registration. The commission shall, within 45 days after holding the hearing, issue a decision on the registration request which shall be based on the findings of fact and conclusions of law based on the evidence presented at the hearing. The decision shall include the findings of fact and the conclusions of law relied upon.

(c) (1) The commission may deny an application for registration in accordance with subdivision (b) on the grounds that the core transport agent or any officer or director of the core transport agent has one or more of the following:

(A) Been convicted of a crime as described in paragraph (8) of subdivision (a) of Section 981.

(B) Failure to make a sufficient showing with respect to paragraphs (1) to (10), inclusive, of subdivision (a) of Section 981.

(C) Knowingly made a false statement of fact in the application for registration.

(2) The commission may deny registration pursuant to this subdivision only if the crime or act is substantially related to the qualifications, functions, or duties required to provide gas service to end use customers of gas or the false statement is material to the registration application. For purposes of this subdivision, conviction of a crime shall be established in the same manner as that set forth in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 480 of the Business and Professions Code.

(d) The commission shall require core transport agents registered under this section to update their registration information set forth in paragraphs (1) to (10), inclusive, of subdivision (a) of Section 981 within 60 days of any material change in the information provided. Material changes to any other information required
 pursuant to this article shall be updated annually.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 604, Sec. 4.   (SB 656)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

983.

(a) The commission shall accept, compile, and attempt to informally resolve consumer complaints regarding core transport agents. If the commission reasonably suspects a pattern of customer abuses, the commission may, on its own motion, initiate investigations into the activities of a core transport agent offering gas service. Consumer complaints regarding service by a public agency offering gas service within the political boundary of the public agency or service territory of a local publicly owned gas utility shall continue to be resolved by the public agency. Within the service territory of a local publicly owned utility, consumer complaints arising from the violation of core transport service rules adopted by the governing body of the local publicly owned utility
 shall be resolved through the local publicly owned utility’s consumer complaint procedures.

(b) Notwithstanding other provisions, core gas customers shall have the option to proceed with a complaint against a core transport agent either through an action filed in the judicial court system or through a complaint filed with the commission. A customer who elects either the judicial or commission remedies may not raise the same claim in both forums. The commission shall have the authority to accept, compile, and resolve core gas consumer complaints, including the authority to award reparations. The commission’s authority in these complaint proceedings is limited to adjudication of complaints regarding core gas service provided by a core transport agent and shall not be expanded to include an award of any damages through regulation of the rates or charges of the core transport
 agent. However, a person or core transport agent that takes a conflict to the commission shall not be precluded from pursuing an appeal of the decision through the courts as provided for by law.

(c) In connection with customer complaints or commission investigations into customer abuses, core transport agents shall provide the commission access to their accounts, books, papers, and documents related to California transactions as described in Sections 313 and 314, if the information is relevant to the complaint or investigation.

(d) A core transport agent shall not discontinue service to a customer for a disputed amount if that customer has filed a complaint that is pending with the commission, and that customer has paid the disputed amount into an
 escrow account.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 604, Sec. 4.   (SB 656)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

983.5.

(a) (1) The commission may enforce Sections 2102, 2103, 2104, 2105, 2107, 2108, and 2114 against a core transport agent as if the core transport agent is a public utility for purposes of those sections.

(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), this section does not grant the commission jurisdiction to regulate core transport agents other than as specifically set forth in this chapter. Core transport agents shall continue to be subject to Sections 2111 and 2112. 

(3) Upon a finding by the commission’s executive director that there is evidence to support a finding that the core transport agent has committed an act
 constituting grounds for suspension or revocation of registration as set forth in subdivision (b), the commission shall notify the core transport agent in writing and notice an expedited hearing on the suspension or revocation of the core transport agent’s registration to be held within 30 days of the notification to the core transport agent of the executive director’s finding of evidence to support suspension or revocation of registration. The commission shall, within 45 days after holding the hearing, issue a decision on the suspension or revocation of registration, which shall be based on findings of fact and conclusions of law based on the evidence presented at the hearing. The decision shall include the findings of fact and the conclusions of law relied upon.

(b) A core transport agent may have its registration suspended or revoked, immediately or prospectively, in whole or
 in part, for any of the following acts:

(1) Making material misrepresentations in the course of soliciting customers, entering into service agreements with those customers, or administering those service agreements.

(2) Dishonesty, fraud, or deceit with the intent to substantially benefit the core transport agent or its employees, agents, or representatives, or to disadvantage retail gas customers.

(3) If the commission finds that there is evidence that the core transport agent is not financially or operationally capable of providing the offered gas service.

(4) The misrepresentation of a material fact by an applicant in obtaining a registration pursuant to Section 981.

(c) Pursuant to its authority to revoke or suspend registration, the commission may suspend a registration for a specified period or revoke the registration, or in lieu of suspension or revocation, impose a moratorium on adding or soliciting additional customers. Any suspension or revocation of a registration shall require the core transport agent to cease serving customers within the boundaries of investor-owned gas corporations, and the affected customers shall be served by the gas corporation until the time when they may select service from another core transport agent. A customer shall not be liable for the payment of any early termination fees or other penalties to any core transport agent under the
 service agreement if the serving core transport agent’s registration is suspended or revoked.

(d) If a customer of a core transport agent is involuntarily returned to service provided by a gas corporation, any reentry fee imposed on that customer that the commission deems is necessary to avoid imposing costs on other customers of the gas corporation shall be the obligation of the core transport agent, except in the case of a customer returned due to default in payment or other contractual obligations or because the customer’s contract has expired. As a condition of its registration, a core transport agent shall post a bond or demonstrate insurance sufficient to cover those reentry fees, including reentry fees for customers returned in the event of the core transport agent becoming insolvent.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 604, Sec. 4.   (SB 656)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

983.7.

If a customer files a claim with a gas corporation for damages to property resulting from the curtailment of gas service due to the failure of the gas corporation to reasonably provide service or restore service within a reasonable time after a fire, flood, earthquake, other natural disaster, or act of God, the gas corporation shall inform the customer that the claim may be pursued in small claims court or other judicial courts, depending on the amount of the claim.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 604, Sec. 4.   (SB 656)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

984.

In order to carry out essential elements of a sustainable and effective consumer protection program in connection with core transport agents offering gas service to core gas customers as intended by the Legislature in this chapter, the following shall apply:

(a) A registration fee of one hundred dollars ($100) shall be collected from a core transport agent required to register under this chapter and the fee proceeds shall be deposited in the Public Utilities Reimbursement Account established under Section 402. The commission may adjust the fee as necessary to recover the cost of administering the program.

(b) The commission shall annually determine the costs of administering the registration program and other facets of consumer protection directly related to the core transport service transactions of core transport agents, including the cost for the duties imposed pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 984.5. The commission shall only collect those costs not already being collected elsewhere. Registrants who fail to submit to the commission required fees or information upon which fees are calculated within 30 days of billing shall be subject to a 15-percent penalty.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 604, Sec. 4.   (SB 656)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

984.5.

(a) The commission shall compile and regularly update the following information: names and contact numbers of a registered core transport agent, information to assist consumers in making service choices, and the number of customer complaints against specific providers in relation to the number of customers served by those providers and the disposition of those complaints. To facilitate this function, registered entities shall file with the commission information describing the terms and conditions of any standard service plan made available to core gas customers. The commission shall adopt a standard format for this filing. The commission shall maintain and make generally available a list of entities offering core transport services operating in California. This list shall include all registered core transport agents and those
 agents not required to be registered that request the commission to be included on the list. The commission shall, upon request, make this information available at no charge. Notwithstanding any other law, public agencies that are registered entities shall be required to disclose their terms and conditions of service contracts only to the same extent that other registered entities would be required to disclose the same or similar service contracts.

(b) The commission shall issue public alerts about companies attempting to provide core transport service in the state in an unauthorized or fraudulent manner as described in subdivision (b) of Section 983.5.

(c) The commission shall compile and post on its Internet Web site easily understandable informational guides or other tools to help core gas customers understand core transport service options. In implementing these provisions,
 the commission shall pay special attention to ensuring that customers, especially those with limited-English-speaking ability or other disadvantages when dealing with marketers, receive correct, reliable, and easily understood information to help them make informed choices. The commission shall not make specific recommendations, rank the relative attractiveness of specific service offerings of registered providers of core transport services, or provide customer-specific assistance in the evaluation of core transport agents.

(d) The Public Advocate’s Office of the Public Utilities Commission shall analyze customers’ complaints submitted to the gas corporation and to the commission and the disposition of those complaints to determine if the changes in the consumer protection rules are necessary to better protect the participants in the core transportation program, and make recommendations to the commission regarding those rule
 changes.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 51, Sec. 45.   (SB 854)   Effective June 27, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

985.

Rules that implement the following minimum standards shall be adopted by the commission for core transport agents offering gas services to core gas customers and the governing body of a public agency offering gas services to core gas customers within its jurisdiction:

(a) Confidentiality. Customer information shall be confidential unless the customer consents in writing. This shall encompass confidentiality of customer-specific billing, credit, or usage information. This requirement shall not extend to disclosure of generic information regarding the usage, load shape, or other general characteristics of a group or rate classification, unless the release of
 that information would reveal customer-specific information because of the size of the group, rate classification, or nature of the information.

(b) Physical disconnects and reconnects. Only a gas corporation, or a publicly owned gas utility, that provides physical delivery service to the affected customer shall have the authority to physically disconnect or reconnect a customer from the transmission or distribution grid. Physical disconnection by gas corporations subject to the commission’s jurisdiction shall occur only in accordance with protocols established by the commission. Physical disconnection by publicly owned gas utilities shall occur only in accordance with protocols established by the governing board of the local publicly owned gas utility.

(c) Change in providers. Upon adequate notice supplied by a core transport agent to the gas corporation or local publicly owned gas utility providing physical delivery service, customers who are eligible for core transport service may change their energy supplier. Energy suppliers may charge for this change, provided that any fee or penalty charged by the supplier associated with early termination of service, shall be disclosed in that contract or applicable tariff.

(d) Written notices. Notices describing the terms and conditions of service as described in Section 986, service agreements, notices of late payment, notices of discontinuance of service, and disconnection notices addressed to core gas customers shall be easily understandable and shall be provided in the language in which the core transport agent offered the services.

(e) Billing. All bills shall have a standard bill format, as determined by the commission or the governing body, and shall contain sufficient detail for the customer to recalculate the bill for accuracy. Any late fees shall be separately stated. A core transport agent shall provide on all customer bills a telephone number by which customers may contact the core transport agent to report and resolve billing inquiries and complaints. A core transport agent contacted by a customer regarding a billing dispute shall advise the customer at the time of the initial contact that the customer may file a complaint with the commission if the customer’s dispute is not satisfactorily resolved by the core transport agent.

(f) Meter integrity. A gas customer shall have a reasonable opportunity to have his or her meter tested to
 ensure the reasonable accuracy of the meter. The commission or governing body shall determine who is responsible for the cost of that testing.

(g) Customer deposits. Core transport agents may require customer deposits before commencing service, but in no event shall the deposit be more than the estimated bill for the customer for a three-month period.

(h) Additional protections. The commission or the governing body may adopt additional core gas consumer protection standards that are in the public interest.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 604, Sec. 4.   (SB 656)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

986.

(a) Except for a gas corporation, or a local publicly owned gas utility offering gas service to core gas customers within its service territory, a core transport agent offering gas service to core gas customers shall, prior to the commencement of service, provide the potential customer with a written notice of the service describing the price, terms, and conditions of the service. The notices shall include all of the following:

(1) A clear description of the price, terms, and conditions of service, including all of the following:
